Nevada, session 83, AB334.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 622.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
622.530 1. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute
relating to the issuance of a license by endorsement, a regulatory
body shall adopt regulations providing for the issuance of a license
by endorsement to engage in an occupation or profession in this
State to any natural person who:
(a) Holds a corresponding valid and unrestricted license to
engage in that occupation or profession in the District of Columbia
or any state or territory of the United States;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) Possesses qualifications that are substantially similar to the
qualifications required for issuance of a license to engage in that
occupation or profession in this State; and
(c) Satisfies the requirements of this section and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must not
allow the issuance of a license by endorsement to engage in an
occupation or profession in this State to a natural person unless such
a person:
(a) Has not been disciplined by the corresponding regulatory
authority of the District of Columbia or any state or territory in
which the applicant currently holds or has held a license to engage
in an occupation or profession;
(b) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable in the District
of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States for
misconduct relating to his or her occupation or profession;
(c) Has not had a license to engage in an occupation or
profession suspended or revoked in the District of Columbia or any
state or territory of the United States;
(d) Has not been refused a license to engage in an occupation or
profession in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States for any reason;
(e) Does not have pending any disciplinary action concerning
his or her license to engage in an occupation or profession in the
District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States;
(f) Pays any applicable fees for the issuance of a license that are
otherwise required for a natural person to obtain a license in this
State;
(g) Submits to the regulatory body a complete set of his or her
fingerprints and written permission authorizing the regulatory body
to forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report or proof that the applicant has
previously passed a comparable criminal background check; and
(h) Submits to the regulatory body the statement required by
NRS 425.520.
3. [A] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 631.190, a
regulatory body may, by regulation, require an applicant for
issuance of a license by endorsement to engage in an occupation or
profession in this State to submit with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the regulatory body that the applicant:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(1) Has achieved a passing score on a nationally recognized,
nationally accredited or nationally certified examination or other
examination approved by the regulatory body;
(2) Has completed the requirements of an appropriate
vocational, academic or professional program of study in the
occupation or profession for which the applicant is seeking a license
by endorsement in this State;
(3) Has engaged in the occupation or profession for which
the applicant is seeking a license by endorsement in this State
pursuant to the applicant’s existing licensure for the period
determined by the regulatory body preceding the date of the
application; and
(4) Possesses a sufficient degree of competency in the
occupation or profession for which he or she is seeking licensure by
endorsement in this State;
(b) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and complete;
and
(c) Any other information required by the regulatory body.
4. Not later than 21 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement to engage in an occupation or
profession pursuant to this section, the regulatory body shall provide
written notice to the applicant of any additional information required
by the regulatory body to consider the application. Unless the
regulatory body denies the application for good cause, the
regulatory body shall approve the application and issue a license by
endorsement to engage in the occupation or profession to the
applicant not later than:
(a) Sixty days after receiving the application;
(b) If the regulatory body requires an applicant to submit
fingerprints and authorize the preparation of a report on the
applicant’s background based on the submission of the applicant’s
fingerprints, 15 days after the regulatory body receives the report; or
(c) If the regulatory body requires the filing and maintenance of
a bond as a requirement for the issuance of a license, 15 days after
the filing of the bond with the regulatory body,
 whichever occurs later.
5. A license by endorsement to engage in an occupation or
profession in this State issued pursuant to this section may be issued
at a meeting of the regulatory body or between its meetings by the
presiding member of the regulatory body and the executive head of
the regulatory body. Such an action shall be deemed to be an action
of the regulatory body.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
6. A regulatory body may deny an application for licensure by
endorsement if:
(a) An applicant willfully fails to comply with the provisions of
paragraph (g) of subsection 2; or
(b) The report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
indicates that the applicant has been convicted of a crime that would
be grounds for taking disciplinary action against the applicant as a
licensee and the regulatory body has not previously taken
disciplinary action against the licensee based on that conviction.
7. The provisions of this section are intended to supplement
other provisions of statute governing licensure by endorsement. If
any provision of statute conflicts with this section, the other
provision of statute prevails over this section to the extent that the
other provisions provide more specific requirements relating to
licensure by endorsement.
Sec. 2. NRS 631.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.190 1. In addition to the powers and duties provided in
this chapter, the Board shall:
[1.] (a) Adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
[2.] (b) Appoint such committees, review panels, examiners,
officers, employees, agents, attorneys, investigators and other
professional consultants and define their duties and incur such
expense as it may deem proper or necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, the expense to be paid as provided in this
chapter.
[3.] (c) Fix the time and place for and conduct examinations for
the granting of licenses to practice dentistry, dental hygiene, dental
therapy and expanded function dental assistance.
[4.] (d) Examine applicants for licenses to practice dentistry,
dental hygiene, dental therapy and expanded function dental
assistance.
[5.] (e) Collect and apply fees as provided in this chapter.
[6.] (f) Keep a register of all dentists, dental hygienists, dental
therapists and expanded function dental assistants licensed in this
State, together with their addresses, license numbers and renewal
certificate numbers.
[7.] (g) Have and use a common seal.
[8.] (h) Keep such records as may be necessary to report the
acts and proceedings of the Board. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 631.368, the records must be open to public inspection.
[9.] (i) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it
finds necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
[10.] (j) Have discretion to examine work authorizations in
dental offices or dental laboratories.
2. The Board may not adopt regulations pursuant to NRS
622.530 that require an applicant for the issuance of a license by
endorsement as a dental hygienist to have practiced dental hygiene
in another state for a specified period of time immediately
preceding the submission of the application.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. Any provision of a regulation adopted by the Board of
Dental Examiners of Nevada which conflicts with the provisions of
subsection 2 of NRS 631.190, as amended by section 2 of this act, is
hereby declared void.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)